Utah statutes.
32B-11-604.   Application for local industry representative license.

(1)  To obtain a local industry representative license, a person shall submit to the department:

(a)  a written application in a form prescribed by the department;

(b)  a nonrefundable $75 application fee;

(c)  an initial license fee of $125, which is refundable if a local industry representative license is not issued;

(d)  verification that the person is:

(i)  a resident of Utah;

(ii)  a Utah partnership;

(iii)  a Utah corporation; or

(iv)  a Utah limited liability company;

(e)  an affidavit stating the name and address of any manufacturer, supplier, or importer the person will represent;

(f)  a signed consent form stating that the local industry representative will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer to have an unrestricted right to enter, during normal business hours, the specific premises where the local industry representative conducts business;

(g)  if the person is an entity, proper verification evidencing that a person who signs the application is authorized to sign on behalf of the entity; and

(h)  any other information the commission or department may require.

(2)  A local industry representative licensee is not required to pay an additional license fee to represent more than one manufacturer, supplier, or importer.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

